Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 6 Implied Consent to Chemical Testing

Cross references. —

As to driving under the influence and presumptions from amount of alcohol in blood, see §

31-5-233

.

As to revocation of driver's license upon conviction of driving under the influence, see §

31-7-127

.

History of implied consent law. —

See State v. Marquez, 638 P.2d 1292,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

Intent of chapter. —

This chapter was intended to facilitate tests for intoxication and not to inhibit the ability of the state to remove drunken drivers from the highways of the state. This chapter was not designed to give greater rights to suspected drunken drivers than were constitutionally afforded before its passage. State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

Chapter must be liberally construed to effectuate its policies.

State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

Stated

in

Feeney v. State, 714 P.2d 1229,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 493

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Filling in the Blanks after Prouse: A New Standard for the Drinking-Driving Roadblock,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 241 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 356 to 372; 8 Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 1085 to 1089.

61A C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 1402 to 1411.

§ 31-6-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Alcohol concentration” means as defined in W.S. 31-5-233(a)(i);

“Controlled substance” includes:

Any drug or substance defined by W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(iv);

Any glue, aerosol or other toxic vapor which when intentionally inhaled or sniffed results in impairment of an individual’s ability to drive safely;

Any drug or psychoactive substance, or combination of these substances, capable of impairing a person’s physical or mental faculties.

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Peace officer” means as defined in W.S.

7-2-101

;

“This act” means W.S.

31-6-101

through

31-6-108

.

The definitions provided by W.S. 31-5-102(a) apply in this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-247.1; Laws 1985, ch. 211, § 1; ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 119, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2010, ch. 5, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “31-6-108” for “31-6-107” in (a)(v).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(ii)(C).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Farmer v. State, Dep't of Transp., 986 P.2d 165,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1999);
Hittner v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT (In re Hittner), 2008 WY 91, 189 P.3d 872,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Aug. 1, 2008);
Reynolds v. State, 2012 WY 120,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Sept 11, 2012).